Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1574.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVI-Z.1REDEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY STARTUP LOAN PROGRAMSection 1601-Z.1. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Fund." The Redevelopment Authority Startup Fund established in this article."Qualified land bank." A public body and a body corporate and politic established under 68 Pa.C.S. Ch. 21 (relating to land banks)."Qualified redevelopment authority." A public body and body corporate and politic created and organized in accordance with the provisions of the act of May 24, 1945 (P.L.991, No.385), known as the Urban Redevelopment Law, and established in a qualified county."Startup loan." A loan issued to a qualified redevelopment authority or a qualified land bank from the fund. Section 1602-Z.1. (Reserved).Section 1603-Z.1. Redevelopment Authority Startup Loan Program.The Redevelopment Authority Startup Loan Program is 20250HB1574PN1862 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829303132 established in the department.Section 1604-Z.1. Application and approval process.(a) Application.--A qualified redevelopment authority or a qualified land bank may apply to the department for a startup loan as provided under this article. An application made under this subsection must be submitted in a form and manner required by the department.(b) Application period.--A qualified redevelopment authority or a qualified land bank may submit an application to the department for a startup loan beginning 60 days after a transfer of money to the fund as appropriated by the General Assembly until the earlier of the following:(1) the date on which all money appropriated by the General Assembly to the fund has been awarded as startup loans; or(2) January 1, 2028.(c) Review.--When reviewing applications for startup loans, the department:(1) Shall provide a startup loan from the fund to at least one qualified redevelopment authority located in a county of each classification, if a county of that classification has applied and the county is in compliance with all requirements established by the department.(2) Shall give priority to qualified redevelopment authorities in a county with existing municipal blight programs, if the county has applied in that county classification.(3) If no qualified redevelopment authority in any of the county classifications has applied, may provide a loan from the fund to at least one land bank in that county 20250HB1574PN1862 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 classification, giving priority to programs in which there is an established municipal blight program.(d) (Reserved).(e) Loan amounts.--A startup loan may not exceed $500,000.Section 1605-Z.1. Startup loans.(a) Eligible uses.--Except as provided under subsection (b), a startup loan may be used by a qualified redevelopment authority or a qualified land bank only for the following purposes:(1) The purchase of a residential property or a commercial property by a qualified redevelopment authority or a qualified land bank . (2) The cost of redevelopment of a residential property or a commercial property purchased under paragraph (1) or owned by the qualified redevelopment authority or the qualified land bank . (3) The cost of remediating a residential property or a commercial property purchased under paragraph (1) or owned by the qualified redevelopment authority or the qualified land bank . (4) The necessary costs or administrative expenses to execute the activities in paragraph (1), (2) or (3), not to exceed 5% of the amount of the startup loan.(b) Ineligible uses.--A startup loan may not be used to pay for any of the following:(1) The operating expenses of the qualified redevelopment authority or the qualified land bank . (2) The refinancing or reduction of a debt or obligation incurred prior to the award of the startup loan.(c) Required repayment.--A qualified redevelopment authority 20250HB1574PN1862 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or a qualified land bank that is awarded a startup loan must enter into a contract for the repayment of the startup loan in accordance with the terms provided under subsection (d).(d) Repayment terms.--A startup loan shall be subject to the following terms and conditions:(1) The term of the startup loan may not exceed 10 years.(2) The interest rate of the startup loan may not exceed 2% per year.(3) The department may require a qualified redevelopment authority or a qualified land bank to provide collateral sufficient in the department's determination to protect the Commonwealth's interests in the startup loan.(e) Deposit of repayment amounts.--The amount of principal repaid by a qualified redevelopment authority or a qualified land bank shall be deposited into the fund. Section 1606-Z.1. Redevelopment Authority Startup Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Redevelopment Authority Startup Fund is established in the State Treasury. The fund shall serve as a revolving loan fund in accordance with this article. The money in the fund is appropriated to the department on a continuing basis for the purpose of making startup loans under this article and paying administrative expenses under subsection (c) . (b) Deposits.--The following shall be deposited into the fund:(1) Amounts appropriated or transferred by act of the General Assembly to the fund.(2) Amounts repaid under section 1605-Z.1(e).(c) Administrative expenses.--The amount of administrative expenses of the department paid from the fund in any fiscal year 20250HB1574PN1862 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 may not exceed 2% of the amount of startup loans awarded in the prior fiscal year.(d) Guidelines.--The department may issue guidelines to implement this article.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1574PN1862 - 6 - 12345